Louisiana, session 2026, HB194.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:5607(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5607. Actions against a professional engineer, surveyor, professional interior
designer, architect, real estate developer; peremptive periods
A. No action for damages against any professional engineer, surveyor,
engineer intern, surveyor intern, or licensee as defined in R.S. 37:682, or any
professional architect, landscape architect, architect intern, or agent as defined in
R.S. 37:141, or professional interior designer, or licensee as defined in R.S. 37:3171,
or other similar licensee licensed under pursuant to the laws of this state, or real
estate developer relative to development plans which have been certified by a
professional engineer or professional architect, whether based upon tort, or breach
of contract, or otherwise arising out of an engagement to provide any manner of
movable or immovable planning, construction, design, or building, which may
include but is not limited to consultation, planning, designs, drawings, specifications,
investigation, evaluation, measuring, or administration related to any building,
construction, demolition, or work, shall be brought unless filed in a court of
competent jurisdiction and proper venue at the latest within five years from:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 194 ENROLLED
(1)(a) The date of registry in the mortgage office of acceptance of the work
by the owner; or.
(2)(b) The date the owner has occupied or taken possession of the
improvement, in whole or in part, if no such acceptance is recorded; or If no such
acceptance is recorded within six months from the date the owner has occupied or
taken possession of the improvement, in whole or in part, the date the improvement
has been occupied by the owner.
(3)(2) The date the person furnishing such the services has completed the
services with regard to actions against that person, if the person performing or
furnishing the services, as described herein, described in this Subsection does not
render the services preparatory to construction, or if the person furnishes such
services preparatory to construction but the person furnishing such services does not
perform any inspection of the work.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.